Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 1. Prostitution and Related Offenses.

Cross references. —

For temporary law providing for task force on the crimes of human trafficking, promoting prostitution, and sex trafficking, established July 1, 2012, and repealed June 1, 2013, see §§ 18, 19, and 21, ch. 70, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 11.66.100.
Prostitution.

A person commits the crime of prostitution if the person

engages in or agrees or offers to engage in sexual conduct in return for a fee; or

offers a fee in return for sexual conduct.

In a prosecution under (e) of this section, it is an affirmative defense that, at the time of the alleged offense, the defendant

reasonably believed the prostitute to be 18 years of age or older; and

undertook reasonable measures to verify that the prostitute was 18 years of age or older.

A person may not be prosecuted under (a)(1) of this section if the

person witnessed or was a victim of, and reported to law enforcement in good faith, one or more of the following crimes:

murder in the first degree under AS

11.41.100

;

murder in the second degree under AS

11.41.110

;

manslaughter under AS

11.41.120

;

criminally negligent homicide under AS

11.41.130

;

assault in the first degree under AS

11.41.200

;

assault in the second degree under AS

11.41.210

;

assault in the third degree under AS

11.41.220

;

assault in the fourth degree under AS

11.41.230

;

sexual assault in the first degree under AS

11.41.410

;

sexual assault in the second degree under AS

11.41.420

;

sexual assault in the third degree under AS

11.41.425

;

sexual assault in the fourth degree under AS

11.41.427

;

sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree under AS

11.41.434

;

sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree under AS

11.41.436

;

sexual abuse of a minor in the third degree under AS

11.41.438

;

sexual abuse of a minor in the fourth degree under AS

11.41.440

;

robbery in the first degree under AS

11.41.500

;

robbery in the second degree under AS

11.41.510

;

extortion under AS

11.41.520

;

coercion under AS

11.41.530

;

distribution of child pornography under AS

11.61.125

;

possession of child pornography under AS

11.61.127

;

sex trafficking in the first degree under AS

11.66.110

;

sex trafficking in the second degree under AS

11.66.120

;

sex trafficking in the third degree under AS

11.66.130

; or

sex trafficking in the fourth degree under AS

11.66.135

;

evidence supporting the prosecution under (a)(1) of this section was obtained or discovered as a result of the person reporting the crime to law enforcement; and

person cooperated with law enforcement personnel.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, prostitution is a class B misdemeanor.

Prostitution is a class C felony if

the defendant violates (a) of this section as a patron of a prostitute;

the prostitute is under 18 years of age; and

the defendant is over 18 years of age and at least three years older than the prostitute.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 24 SLA 2007; am §§ 6, 7 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am § 36 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

Definition of “sexual conduct” — AS

11.66.150

Promoting prostitution in the first, second, and third degree — AS

11.66.110

—

11.66.130

Original Code Provision — AS 11.40.210; AS 11.40.230.

TD: IV, 99-100.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For punishment for class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (e); relettered in 2016, at which time other subsections were also relettered.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 36(d), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that the 2007 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Section 27(b), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor’s transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 11.66.110.
Sex trafficking in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of sex trafficking in the first degree if the person

induces or causes another person to engage in prostitution through the use of force;

as other than a patron of a prostitute, induces or causes another person who is under 20 years of age to engage in prostitution; or

induces or causes a person in that person’s legal custody to engage in prostitution.

In a prosecution under (a)(2) of this section, it is not a defense that the defendant reasonably believed that the person induced or caused to engage in prostitution was 20 years of age or older.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, sex trafficking in the first degree is a class A felony.

A person convicted under (a)(2) of this section is guilty of an unclassified felony.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 50 SLA 1983; am §§ 9 — 12 ch 24 SLA 2007; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am § 37 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

Definition of “force” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Assault in the first, second, third, and fourth degree — AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.230

Prostitution — AS

11.66.100

Prostitution in the second and third degree — AS

11.66.120

—

11.16.130

Corroboration of certain testimony not required — AS

11.66.140

Original Code Provision — AS 11.40.200; AS 11.40.340.

TD: IV, 103.

For punishment of unclassified felonies under AS

11.66.110(a)(2)

, see AS

12.55.125(i)

.

For class A felonies under AS

11.66.120(a)(3)

, see AS

12.55.125(c)

.

For fines, see AS

12.55.035

.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (a), see sec. 185(b)(1), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(1), substituted “another person” for “a person”, in (a)(2), substituted “another person who is” for “a person”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 36(d), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that the 2007 amendments of (a) — (d) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Section 27(a), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendment replacing the term “promoting prostitution” with “sex trafficking” in (a) of this section applies to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Section 27(b), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to (a)(2) and (b) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012; and that the 2012 amendments (c) of this section apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 11.66.120.
Sex trafficking in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of sex trafficking in the second degree if the person

manages, supervises, controls, or owns, either alone or in association with others, a prostitution enterprise other than a place of prostitution;

procures or solicits a patron for a prostitute; or

offers, sells, advertises, promotes, or facilitates travel that includes commercial sexual conduct as enticement for the travel; in this paragraph, “commercial sexual conduct” means sexual conduct for which anything of value is given or received by any person.

Sex trafficking in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 2006; am § 13 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 11 ch 1 TSSLA 2012)

Cross references. —

Definition of “place of prostitution,” “prostitution enterprise” — AS

11.66.150

Prostitution — AS

11.66.100

Promoting prostitution in the first degree — AS

11.66.110

Promoting prostitution in the third degree — AS

11.66.130

Corroboration of certain testimony not required — AS

11.66.140

Original Code Provision — AS 11.40.380; AS 11.40.420.

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 36(d), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that the 2007 amendment of (b) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Section 27(a), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to this section apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 11.66.130.
Sex trafficking in the third degree.

A person commits the crime of sex trafficking in the third degree if the person

receives compensation for prostitution services rendered by another; and

with the intent to promote prostitution,

manages, supervises, controls, or owns, either alone or in association with others, a place of prostitution;

as other than a patron of a prostitute, induces or causes another person who is 20 years of age or older to engage in prostitution;

receives or agrees to receive money or other property under an agreement or understanding that the money or other property is derived from prostitution; or

engages in conduct that institutes, aids, or facilitates a prostitution enterprise.

[Repealed, § 72, ch 1 4SSLA 2017.]

Sex trafficking in the third degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 12 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am §§
38, 39 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 21, 72 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

Definition of “place of prostitution,” “prostitution enterprise” — AS

11.66.150

Prostitution — AS

11.66.100

Promoting prostitution in the first and second degree — AS

11.66.110

,

11.66.120

Corroboration of certain testimony not required — AS

11.66.140

Offenses defined by age or value — AS

11.81.615

Original Code Provision — AS 11.40.260; AS 11.40.300; AS 11.40.400; AS 11.40.410.

TD: IV, 100-04.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 75(a)(18), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (b); relettered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(2), substituted “another person who is” for “a person”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in the introductory language of (a), deleted ", with intent to promote prostitution," following "in the third degree", added (a)(1) and the introductory language of (a)(2), added the subparagraph designations for (a)(2)(A)-(D), and in (a)(2)(C), deleted "as other than a prostitute receiving compensation for personally rendered prostitution services," at the beginning; repealed (b).

Editor's notes. —

Section 36(d), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that the 2007 amendments of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Section 27, ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, in the Temporary and Special Acts, provides that the 2012 amendment replacing the term “18” with “20” in (a)(2) of this section applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012; all other 2012 amendments to this section apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 11.66.135.
Sex trafficking in the fourth degree.

A person commits the crime of sex trafficking in the fourth degree if the person

receives compensation for prostitution services rendered by another; and

engages in conduct that institutes, aids, or facilitates prostitution under circumstances not proscribed under AS

11.66.130(a)(2)(D)

.

[Repealed, § 72 ch 1 4SSLA 2017.]

Sex trafficking in the fourth degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 15 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 13 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am § 40 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 22, 72 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (b); relettered in 2016.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 75(a)(19), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, added (a)(1), in (a)(2) substituted “AS

11.66.130(a)(2)(D)

” for “AS 11.66.130(a)(4)”, and made a related change; repealed (b).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 36(d), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Section 27(a), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to this section apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 11.66.140.
Corroboration of certain testimony not required.

In a prosecution under AS

11.66.110

—

11.66.135

, it is not necessary that the testimony of the person whose prostitution is alleged to have been compelled or promoted be corroborated by the testimony of any other witness or by documentary or other types of evidence.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 1 TSSLA 2012)

Cross references. —

Promoting prostitution in the first, second, and third degree — AS

11.66.110

—

11.66.130

Original Code Provision — AS

12.45.040

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 27(b), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 11.66.145.
Forfeiture.

Property used to institute, aid, or facilitate, or received or derived from, a violation of AS

11.66.100(e)

or

11.66.110

—

11.66.135

may be forfeited at sentencing.

History.

(§ 16 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 15 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am § 10 ch 43 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 36(d), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Section 27(b), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor’s transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 11.66.150.
Definitions.

In AS

11.66.100

—

11.66.150

, unless the context requires otherwise,

“compensation” does not include any payment for reasonably apportioned shared expenses;

“place of prostitution” means any place where a person engages in sexual conduct in return for a fee;

“prostitution enterprise” means an arrangement in which two or more persons are organized to render sexual conduct in return for a fee;

“sexual conduct” means genital or anal intercourse, cunnilingus, fellatio, or masturbation of one person by another person.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 23 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

Definition of “person” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Prostitution offenses — AS

11.66.100

—

11.66.140

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: IV 97-99.

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 enactment of paragraph (1), see sec. 75(a)(20), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (1) was enacted as (4); renumbered in 2017, at which time former paragraphs (1) — (3) were renumbered as (2) — (4).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, added (4) [now (1)].